Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-406
Limitation on cause of action.

No cause of action under the Minor Alcoholic Liquor Liability Act shall be available to the intoxicated person, his or her estate, or anyone whose claim is based upon injury to or death of the intoxicated person.

Laws 2007, LB573, § 6.